Louisiana, session 2026, SB307.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 25:1281, 1282(A), (B), and (C), and 1283 are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 32. DISPLAY OF RELIGIOUS DOCUMENTS
AS CULTURE, TRADITION, AND THE HISTORY OF LAW
§1281. Legislative finding
The Legislature of Louisiana finds that:
(1) There is a need to educate and inform the public as to the history and
background tradition of American law and Louisiana law.
(2) America and Louisiana's religious history plays an important role in the
background of our American law and Louisiana law.
(3) The role of religion in the constitutional history of both the United States
Page 1 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 307 ENROLLED
of America and Louisiana is acknowledged by historians as part of our culture,
tradition, and history.
(4) The basic Basic knowledge of American legal history is important to the
formation of civic virtue in our society and, therefore, recognizing the historical
role of the Ten Commandments, the Mayflower Compact, the Declaration of
Independence, and the Northwest Ordinance of 1787 accords with the nation's
history and reflects the founders' understanding of the necessity of civic
morality to a functional self-government.
(5) The courts have provided vital direction to the Legislature of Louisiana
on how to approach the display of historical documents.
(6) In 2005, the Supreme Court of the United States recognized that it is
permissible to display the Ten Commandments on government property in Van
Orden v. Perry, 545 U.S. 677, 688 (2005).
(7) In 2019, the Supreme Court of the United States further recognized
that the Ten Commandments "have historical significance as one of the
foundations of our legal system. . .", in American Legion v. American Humanist
Association, 588 U.S. 29, 53 (2019) and, the court also ruled that the displaying
of the Ten Commandments on public property may have "multiple purposes"
such as "historical significance as one of the foundations of our legal system"
and represents a "common cultural heritage". Id. at 54.
(8) The Mayflower Compact of 1620 was America's first written
constitution and made a Covenant with Almighty God to "form a civil body
politic". This was the first purely American document of self-government and
affirmed the link between civil society and God.
(9) The Declaration of Independence, adopted by Congress on July 4,
1776, provides that "(we) hold these truths to be self-evident, that all men are
created equal, that they are endowed by their Creator with certain unalienable
Rights, that among these are Life, Liberty and the pursuit of Happiness".
(10) The Northwest Ordinance of 1787 provided a method of admitting
new states to the Union from the territory as the country expanded to the
Page 2 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 307 ENROLLED
Pacific. The Ordinance "extended the fundamental principles of civil and
religious liberty" to the territories and stated that "(r)eligion, morality, and
knowledge, being necessary to good government and the happiness of mankind,
schools and the means of education shall forever be encouraged".
(6)(11) The Legislature of Louisiana now endorses the prolongation of a
uniform, sound, distinct, and appropriate presentation of the story of the role of
religion in the constitutional history of the United States of America and Louisiana,
which may be publicly displayed in court houses, and other state and local buildings,
at the Louisiana State Capitol, and throughout the state of Louisiana.
(12) The text of the Ten Commandments set forth in R.S. 25:1282(C) is
identical to the text of the Ten Commandments monument that was upheld by
the Supreme Court of the United States in Van Orden v. Perry, 545 U.S. 677, 688
(2005).
(13) It is the legislature's intent to apply the decision set forth by the
Supreme Court of the United States in Van Orden v. Perry, id. to continue the
rich tradition and ensure that the public has an opportunity to understand and
appreciate the foundational documents of our state and national government.
(14) The Supreme Court of the United States acknowledged that the Ten
Commandments may be displayed on government property when a private
donation is made for the purchase of the historical monument. Pleasant Grove
City v. Summum, 555 U.S. 460 (2009).
(15) It is the intention of the Legislature of Louisiana that this Section
shall not create an unfunded mandate on any public governing authority.
Government agencies are encouraged to use documents that are printed, or
displays that are produced, and made available to the agency at no cost.
§1282. Public displays of religious history impacting the law
A. Public displays with acknowledged religious history may include, but shall
not be limited to, any of the items in this Section.
B. The Mayflower Compact, written and adopted in 1620, the text of which
reads as follows:
Page 3 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 307 ENROLLED
Mayflower Compact (1620 A.D.)
Agreement Between the Settlers at New Plymouth: 1620
IN THE NAME OF GOD, AMEN. We, whose names are underwritten, the
Loyal Subjects of our dread Sovereign Lord, King James, by the Grace of God, of
Great Britain, France, and Ireland, King, Defender of the Faith. Having undertaken
for the Glory of God, and Advancement of the Christian Faith, and the Honour of our
King and Country, a voyage to plant the first colony in the northern Parts of Virginia;
do by these presents, solemnly and mutually, in the Presence of God and one
another, covenant and combine ourselves together into a civil Body Politick, for our
better Ordering and Preservation, and Furtherance of the Ends aforesaid: And by
Virtue hereof do enact, constitute, and frame, such just and equal Laws, Ordinances,
Acts, Constitutions and Offices, from time to time, as shall be thought most meet and
convenient for the General good of the Colony; unto which we promise all due
submission and obedience. In Witness whereof we have hereunto subscribed our
names at Cape Cod the eleventh of November, in the Reign of our Sovereign Lord
King James, of England, France, and Ireland, the eighteenth, and of Scotland the
fifty-fourth, Anno Domini; 1620.
C. The Ten Commandments, as extracted from the Bible. The text shall read
as follows:
"The Ten Commandments
I AM the LORD thy God.
Thou shalt have no other gods before me.
Thou shalt not make to thyself any graven images.
Thou shalt not take the Name of the Lord thy God in vain.
Remember the Sabbath day, to keep it holy.
Honor thy father and thy mother, that thy days may be long upon the land which
the Lord thy God giveth thee.
Thou shalt not kill.
Thou shalt not commit adultery.
Thou shalt not steal.
Page 4 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 307 ENROLLED
Thou shalt not bear false witness against thy neighbor.
Thou shalt not covet thy neighbor's house.
Thou shalt not covet thy neighbor's wife, nor his manservant, nor his maidservant,
nor his cattle, nor anything that is thy neighbor's."
* * *
§1283. Context of public display
Public displays set forth in R.S. 25:1282(B), (C), (D), and (E) shall be
accompanied by a document entitled "Context for Acknowledging America's
Religious History as Culture, Tradition, and the History of Law" which shall read
as follows:
(1) Some documents stand out as pivotal in the religious history of America
and Louisiana's legal system, among which are the Mayflower Compact, The
Declaration of Independence as a legal foundation for the United States Constitution,
the Ten Commandments as one of the foundations of our legal system, and the
Northwest Ordinance, which was a primary document affirming faith and the first
congressional act legally prohibiting slavery. It is hoped that their study and relation
to each other and the history of our state and nation will foster an appreciation for
the role that religion has played in the culture, tradition, and legal history of the
law of America and the state of Louisiana and prompt further public study.
(2) American law, constitutionalism, and political theory have deep roots in
religion. American ideals about liberty, freedom, equality, legal responsibility and
codes of law, to mention a few, have roots and underpinnings in religion and biblical
literacy. The Ten Commandments, which are found in the Book of Exodus in the Old
Testament of the Bible, was were one of the earliest written expressions of law to be
incorporated in American legal systems. The Ten Commandments, or the law of
nature, also impacted the Declaration of Independence which refers to the "laws of
nature and of Nature's God."
Section 2. R.S. 49:150.1(J) and (K) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§150.1. State capitol complex; allocation of space; maintenance; law enforcement
officer and firefighter memorial; Gold Star Families monument;
Page 5 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 307 ENROLLED
African-American military service members monument; the Ten
Commandments
* * *
J.(1) The commissioner of administration shall permit and arrange for
the placement on the Louisiana State Capitol grounds of a suitable monument
displaying the Ten Commandments. The commissioner shall designate the
location of the monument, which shall be among other monuments, and shall
oversee its installation. The design, construction, placement, and maintenance
of the monument shall be free of charge to the state. The commissioner may
delegate his responsibilities provided in this Subsection to the office of state
buildings.
(2) The commissioner shall accept and consider proposals for the
monument from private entities and shall select the proposal for the monument
that will be installed. In selecting a proposal, the commissioner shall consider
the appropriateness of the proposed design, the demonstrated ability of the
responsible entity to pay the cost of design, construction, installation, and
maintenance of the monument, and any other factor he deems appropriate. The
commissioner shall make such selection by December 31, 2026; however, if he
has not received an acceptable proposal by that date, he shall select the first
acceptable proposal he receives after that date.
(3)(a) The overall dimensions of the monument shall not exceed six feet
in height, four feet in width, and four feet in depth, including any base on which
the monument sits.
(b) The monument shall use the same text provided in R.S. 25:1282,
which is the same text that was used in Van Orden v. Perry, 545 U.S. 677 (2005),
that was ruled constitutional by the Supreme Court of the United States.
(c) The monument shall include a plaque that includes the text of the
"Context for Acknowledging America's Religious History as Culture, Tradition,
and the History of Law" as set forth in R.S. 25:1283.
K.(1) An outdoor display or monument authorized pursuant to this
Page 6 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 307 ENROLLED
Section shall be maintained in a manner that preserves the structural integrity,
legibility, and respectful appearance of the display or monument.
(2) The commissioner shall ensure that each outdoor display or
monument is maintained in accordance with this Subsection, including
providing for any necessary cleaning, repair, or restoration resulting from
weathering, vandalism, or other damage. Responsibility for such maintenance
shall be assigned to the private entity selected to provide the display or
monument or to another private entity selected by the commissioner.
(3) If the entity responsible for maintenance fails to maintain the display
or monument in accordance with this Subsection, the commissioner of
administration shall provide written notice of the deficiency and a reasonable
opportunity to cure the deficiency. If the deficiency is not timely cured and the
commissioner is unable to secure another private entity to assume responsibility
for maintenance, the commissioner may remove the display or monument.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 7 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.